Virginia statutes. Title 42.1. Libraries.
Article 4. Historical Material Relating to World War II.

§ 42.1-30.
Repealed by Acts 2022 c. 355.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-64Former § 42.1–30 regarding Virginia World War History Commission abolished; duties transferred to Librarian of Virginia was derived from 1950, § 42–64; 1970, c. 606; 1998, c. 427.; 1970, c. 606; 1998, c. 427; repealed by 2022, c. 355.

§ 42.1-31.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 355.

History.

Code 1950, § 42-65Former § 42.1–31 regarding counties and cities may submit material was derived from 1950, § 42–65; 1970, c. 606; 1998, c. 427.; 1970, c. 606; 1998, c. 427; repealed by 2022, c. 355.

§ 42.1-32.
Repealed by Acts 2022, c. 355.

History.

Former § 42.1–32 was reserved.; repealed by 2022, c. 355.